District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.17

Specific requirements for reports of receipts and expenditures by political committees.

(a)

Each report submitted to the Director of Campaign Finance pursuant to the requirements set forth in § 1-1163.09 shall also disclose the name and address of each political committee or candidate from which the reporting committee or the candidate received, or to which that committee or candidate made, any transfer of funds, together with the amounts and dates of all transfers.

(b)

In the case of reports filed by a political committee on behalf of initiative, referendum, or recall measures under this section, the reports shall be filed on the dates as the Elections Board may by rule prescribe, but in no event shall more than 4 separate reports be required during the consideration of a particular initiative, referendum, or recall measure by any political committee or committees collecting signatures, or supporting or opposing the measures.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 317, 59 DCR 1862